Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
CHAPTER 7 Treatment of Youthful Offenders

Cross references.

Judicial proceedings involving juveniles, T. 15, C. 11.

Disposition of dependent child, as that term is defined, §

15-11-212

.

Powers and duties of Department of Human Resources regarding children and youth services, §

49-5-1

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 420, effective March 27, 1985, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this chapter and enacted the current chapter. The former chapter, which also dealt with treatment of youthful offenders, consisted of Code Sections 42-7-1 through 42-7-16. The former chapter also created the Youthful Offender Division of the Department of Offender Rehabilitation (now Department of Corrections) and described that former division’s powers and duties. While several provisions of Code sections of the former chapter were carried forward into the new chapter (see historical citations in this chapter), the following Acts formed the basis of Code sections which were not carried forward: Ga. L. 1972, p. 592, §§ 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 13, 14; Ga. L. 1975, p. 900, §§ 2, 7; Ga. L. 1978, p. 922, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 42; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 420, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that that Act would not operate to deny any rights to any youthful offender currently on probation pursuant to the “Georgia Youthful Offender Act of 1972,” but any such person would remain on probation subject to any conditions as previously specified.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 270, § 13, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly recognizes that criminal street gangs have succeeded at times in maintaining their structure, organization, and discipline in penal institutions and have continued to conduct criminal activities while incarcerated. Therefore, the General Assembly requests and encourages state and local officials with responsibility for the operation of adult and juvenile penal institutions and related facilities to develop policies and procedures which will identify members of criminal street gangs and, where necessary, to separate members and associates of the same criminal street gang in order that such gang members cannot maintain the gang’s structure, organization, and discipline and will have a more difficult time in conducting criminal activities while incarcerated in this state.”

42-7-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Youthful Offender Act of 1972.”

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 592, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 420, § 1.

42-7-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Board” means the Board of Corrections.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of corrections.

“Conviction” means a judgment on a verdict or finding of guilty, a plea of guilty, or a plea of nolo contendere in a felony case but excludes all judgments upon criminal offenses for which the maximum punishment provided by law is death or life imprisonment.

“Court” means any court of competent jurisdiction other than a juvenile court.

“Department” means the Department of Corrections.

“Treatment” means corrective and preventative incarceration, guidance, and training designed to protect the public by correcting the antisocial tendencies of youthful offenders, which may include but is not limited to vocational, educational, and other training deemed fit and necessary by the department.

“Youthful offender” means any male offender who is at least 17 but less than 25 years of age at the time of conviction and who in the opinion of the department has the potential and desire for rehabilitation.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 592, § 2; Ga. L. 1973, p. 581, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 900, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 420, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, following the passage of Ga. L. 1985, p. 420, “Corrections” was substituted for “Offender Rehabilitation” and “corrections” was substituted for “offender rehabilitation”.

42-7-3.
Providing institutions and facilities.

Youthful offenders shall undergo treatment in secure institutions, including training schools, hospitals, farms, and forestry and other camps and including vocational training facilities and other institutions and agencies that will provide the essential varieties of treatment.

The commissioner may, to the extent necessary, set aside such facilities described in subsection (a) of this Code section as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

To the extent possible, such institutions and facilities shall be used only for treatment of youthful offenders who have the potential and desire for rehabilitation as provided in this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-7-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 420, § 1.

42-7-4.
Studies and diagnoses; placement of youthful offender by department.

The commissioner shall cause to be made a complete study and diagnosis of each youthful offender, including a physical examination and, where possible and indicated, a mental examination. In the absence of exceptional circumstances, each study and diagnosis shall be completed within a period of 60 days from the date of commitment.

Upon the receipt of all reports and recommendations required by subsection (a) of this Code section, the department shall:

Allocate and direct a transfer of the youthful offender to an institution or facility for treatment; or

Order the youthful offender confined and afforded treatment under such conditions as are necessary for the protection of the public.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-7-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 420, § 1.

42-7-5.
Transfer.

The commissioner may order the transfer of the offender from one institution or facility to any other institution or facility operated by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-7-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 420, § 1.

42-7-6.
Notification of State Board of Pardons and Paroles.

After receipt of the reports and recommendations provided for by subsection (a) of Code Section 42-7-4 and the commissioner or his designee has determined whether or not an individual shall receive youthful offender treatment, the State Board of Pardons and Paroles shall be notified.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-7-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 420, § 1.

42-7-7.
Adoption of policies and procedures.

The State Board of Pardons and Paroles shall adopt policies and procedures concerning individuals designated to receive youthful offender treatment.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-7-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 420, § 1.

42-7-8.
Court recommendation of treatment as youthful offender.

If a court finds that a youthful offender might benefit from this chapter, the court may recommend that a young offender be treated as a youthful offender by indicating the recommendation in writing in the sentence itself. When the judge has recommended in the sentence that a person be given youthful offender treatment, release may be made without regard to limitations placed upon the service of a portion of the prison sentence provided by Code Section 42-9-45. After the offender is evaluated, the department will make the decision concerning the placement of the offender.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-7-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 420, § 1.

Cross references.

Sentence and punishment generally, T. 17, C. 10.

Punishment of misdemeanor first offenders, §

17-10-3

.

Law reviews.

For article on the effect of nolo contendere plea on conviction, see 13 Ga. L. Rev. 723 (1979).

42-7-9.
Construction of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall limit or affect the power of any court to proceed in accordance with any other applicable provisions of law.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed in any way to amend, repeal, or affect the jurisdiction of the juvenile court system of this state.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed in any way to amend, repeal, or affect the jurisdiction of the State Board of Pardons and Paroles. A person sentenced under this chapter shall have his eligibility for parole computed in the same manner as other offenders sentenced to the jurisdiction of the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-7-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 420, § 1.

Cross references.

Juvenile proceedings generally, T. 15, C. 11.